Florida, session 2026, SB174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âCharlie Kirk Memorial Avenue designated; 11 Department of Transportation to erect suitable markers.â 12 (1)âThat portion of S.R. 985/S.W. 107th Avenue between S.W. 13 24th Street and S.R. 90/S.W. 8th Street in Miami-Dade County is 14 designated as âCharlie Kirk Memorial Avenue.â 15 (2)âThe Department of Transportation is directed to erect 16 suitable markers designating Charlie Kirk Memorial Avenue as 17 described in subsection (1). 18 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.